Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.050

Fees in special cases.

Every officer who shall be called on or required to perform service for which no fees or compensation are provided for in this chapter shall be allowed fees similar and equal to those allowed him or her for services of the same kind for which allowance is made herein.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4015; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.050. Prior: Code 1881 s 2098; 1869 p 374 s 20; 1863 p 398 s 5; 1861 p 41 s 5; 1854 p 375 s 4; RRS s 4234.]